Washington statutes.
RCW 18.06.200

Health care insurance benefits not mandatory.

Nothing in this chapter may be construed to require that individual or group policies or contracts of an insurance carrier, health care service contractor, or health maintenance organization provide benefits or coverage for services and supplies provided by a person licensed under this chapter.

[ 1995 c 323 s 14; 1985 c 326 s 20.]